New York, session 2025-2026, S10450.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Policies and procedures that ensure that schools do not treat a 4 transgender or gender non-conforming student differently from the way 5 they treat other students of the same gender identity or gender 6 expression that include, but are not limited to policies which: 7 a. ensure that schools and school employees treat students consistent- 8 ly with their gender identity or expression, including using pronouns 9 and names consistent with the student's gender identity or expression, 10 even if their education records or identification documents indicate a 11 different sex. Schools shall not require that students obtain a medical 12 diagnosis, treatment, or identification documents that reflect their 13 gender identity or expression as a prerequisite to treating the students 14 consistent with their gender identity or expression; 15 b. allow students to participate in sex-segregated activities and 16 access sex-segregated facilities, including but not limited to rest- 17 rooms, locker rooms, athletics teams, student organizations, single-sex 18 classes, and student housing or overnight accommodations, in a manner 19 consistent with the student's gender identity or expression; and 20 c. protect students' privacy related to their transgender or gender 21 non-conforming status, including their birth name or sex assigned at 22 birth, and allow students to request that a school amend information in 23 the student's education records relating to their gender identity or 24 expression that is inaccurate, misleading, or in violation of the 25 student's privacy rights. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01947-01-5